Vermont, session 2025-2026, H662.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 8557 is amended to read:
§ 8557. VERMONT FIRE SERVICE TRAINING COUNCIL
(a)(1) Sums for the expenses of the operation of training facilities and
curriculum of the Vermont Fire Service Training Council not to exceed
$1,500,000.00 per year shall be paid to the Fire Safety Special Fund created by
20 V.S.A. § 3157 by insurance companies, writing fire, homeowners multiple
peril, allied lines, farm owners multiple peril, commercial multiple peril (fire
VT LEG #386158 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.662
2026 Page 2 of 3
and allied lines), private passenger and commercial auto, and inland marine
policies on property and persons situated within the State of Vermont within
30 days after notice from the Commissioner of Financial Regulation of such
estimated expenses. Captive companies shall be excluded from the effect of
this section.
(2) The Commissioner shall annually, on or before July 1, apportion
such charges among all such companies and shall assess them for the charges
on a fair and reasonable basis as a percentage of their gross direct written
premiums on such insurance written during the second prior calendar year on
property situated in the State. The Department of Taxes shall collect all
assessments under this section.
(3)(A) An amount not less than $100,000.00 shall be specifically
allocated to the provision of what are now or formerly referred to as Level I,
units I, II, and III (basic) courses for entry-level firefighters.
(B) An amount not less than $145,000.00 shall be specifically
allocated to the provision of cancer screenings that comply with National Fire
Prevention Association (NFPA) 1580, Standard for Emergency Responder
Occupational Health and Wellness, for all individuals entering the Vermont
Fire Academy’s Firefighter I certification program.
* * *
VT LEG #386158 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.662
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386158 v.1